Texas, session 891, HB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Article 2A.105, Code of Criminal Procedure, is amended by adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (d)  A judge of a court in which a district or county attorney represents the state shall declare the attorney disqualified for purposes of Article 2A.104 with respect to a criminal case or proceeding involving the election laws of this state, on a showing that the attorney has adopted a policy or practice, or is following or enforcing a policy or practice, under which the attorney consistently refuses or declines to prosecute a violation of the election laws of this state. SECTION 2.  Section 273.021, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (d)  In accordance with an appointment made under Article 2A.104(b), the attorney general may prosecute a criminal offense prescribed by the election laws of this state on the disqualification of a district or county attorney under Article 2A.105(d), Code of Criminal Procedure. SECTION 3.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to the prosecution of an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act.  The prosecution of an offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose.  For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2025.